Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.070

Powers and duties—Licensure procedures—Register—Rules.

The board has the following powers and duties:

(1) To develop and administer, or approve, or both, a licensure examination. The board may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities.

(2) The board shall adopt rules and regulations to promote safety, protection, and the welfare of the public, to carry out the purposes of this chapter, to aid the board in the performance of its powers and duties, and to govern the practice of optometry. The administrative regulations shall include the classification and licensure of optometrists by examination or credentials, retirement of a license, and reinstatement of a license.

(3) The board shall have the authority to provide rule making regarding the allowable procedures and their educational requirements within the confines of this chapter and chapter 18.53 RCW.

(4) The board shall keep a register containing the name, address, license number, email, and phone number of every person licensed to practice optometry in this state to the best of their ability.

[ 2023 c 400 s 3; 1995 c 198 s 7; 1991 c 3 s 140; 1986 c 259 s 84; 1979 c 158 s 49; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 10; 1963 c 25 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.